Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-2709
Applicability of sections.

Sections 60-2701 to 60-2709 shall apply to motor vehicles beginning with the manufacturer's 1984 model year.

Laws 1983, LB 155, § 9.